Hawaii statutes.
§456-11 Protests; negotiable paper.
All facts, extracts from documents, and circumstances, so noted, shall be
signed and sworn to by all the persons appearing to protest. The notary public
shall note, extend, and record the protest so made; and shall grant
authenticated copies thereof, under the notary's signature and notarial seal,
to those who request and pay for the same. The notary shall also, in behalf of
any person interested, present any bill of exchange, or other negotiable paper,
for acceptance or payment to any party on whom the same is drawn or who may be
liable therefor; and notify all indorsers or other parties to such bill or
paper. The notary may, in general, do all the acts to be done by notaries
public by the usages of merchants, or which are authorized by the laws of the
State. [CC 1859, §1270; RL 1925, §3178; RL 1935, §5204; RL 1945, §7671; RL
1955, §168-11; HRS §456-11; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Sufficient protest. 9 H. 299 (1893).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next